Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2 Termination of Entities
4-29-236. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2015.

The following governmental entities shall terminate on June 30, 2015:

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, committee terminated.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; advisory council terminated.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2009 amendment, board terminated.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, committee terminated.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, committee terminated.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, institute terminated.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, committee terminated.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, committee terminated.]

Review committee, created by former § 12-4-109 [See the Compiler’s Notes];

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, board terminated.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2009 amendment, removed from governmental review.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

Each department, commission, board, agency, or council of state government created during calendar year 2013 terminates on June 30, 2015.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2008, ch. 621, § 2; 2008, ch. 652, § 2; 2008, ch. 659, § 2; 2008, ch. 660, § 2; 2008, ch. 703, § 2; 2008, ch. 704, § 2; 2008, ch. 705, § 2; 2008, ch. 707, § 2; 2008, ch. 709, § 2; 2008, ch. 710, § 2; 2008, ch. 711, § 2; 2008, ch. 815, § 2; 2008, ch. 816, § 2; 2008, ch. 822, § 2; 2008, ch. 823, § 2; 2008, ch. 825, § 2; 2008, ch. 833, § 2; 2008, ch. 838, § 2; 2008, ch. 842, § 2; 2008, ch. 876, § 2; 2008, ch. 1098, § 2; 2009, ch. 9, § 2; 2009, ch. 10, § 2; 2009, ch. 15, § 2; 2009, ch. 16, § 2; 2009, ch. 19, § 2; 2009, ch. 20, § 2; 2009, ch. 22, § 2; 2009, ch. 40, § 2; 2009, ch. 41, § 2; 2009, ch. 42, § 2; 2009, ch. 43, § 2; 2009, ch. 60, § 2; 2009, ch. 61, § 2; 2009, ch. 63, § 2; 2009, ch. 64, § 2; 2009, ch. 91, § 2; 2009, ch. 134, § 2; 2009, ch. 142, § 1; 2009, ch. 164, § 2; 2009, ch. 232, § 2; 2009, ch. 249, § 2; 2009, ch. 341, § 2; 2009, ch. 444, § 2; 2009, ch. 445, § 2; 2009, ch. 541, § 2; 2011, ch. 15, § 2; 2011, ch. 62, § 2; 2011, ch. 63, § 2; 2011, ch. 64, § 2; 2011, ch. 65, § 2; 2011, ch. 83, § 2; 2011, ch. 170, § 2; 2011, ch. 227, § 2; 2011, ch. 482, § 2; 2012, ch. 765, § 2; 2012, ch. 808, § 2; 2012, ch. 988, § 2; 2013, ch. 31, § 1; 2013, ch. 86, § 2; 2013, ch. 127, § 2; 2013, ch. 133, § 2; 2013, ch. 288, § 2; 2013, ch. 289, § 102; 2013, ch. 330, § 2; 2013, ch. 334, § 2; 2013, ch. 348, § 1; 2013, ch. 374, § 1; 2013, ch. 455, § 1; 2014, ch. 515, § 2; 2014, ch. 519, § 1; 2014, ch. 565, § 2; 2014, ch. 620, § 2; 2015, ch. 1, § 1; 2015, ch. 2, § 1; 2015, ch. 3, § 1; 2015, ch. 4, § 1; 2015, ch. 5, § 1; 2015, ch. 6, § 1; 2015, ch. 7, § 1; 2015, ch. 8, § 1; 2015, ch. 9, § 1; 2015, ch. 10, § 1; 2015, ch. 11, § 1; 2015, ch. 12, § 1; 2015, ch. 13, § 1; 2015, ch. 16, § 1; 2015, ch. 17, § 1; 2015, ch. 18, § 1; 2015, ch. 30, § 1; 2015, ch. 31, § 1; 2015, ch. 32, § 1; 2015, ch. 33, § 1; 2015, ch. 34, § 1; 2015, ch. 35, § 1; 2015, ch. 36, § 1; 2015, ch. 37, § 1; 2015, ch. 62, § 1; 2015, ch. 63, § 1; 2015, ch. 64, § 1; 2015, ch. 65, § 1; 2015, ch. 66, § 1; 2015, ch. 72, § 1; 2015, ch. 86, § 1; 2015, ch. 87, § 1; 2015, ch. 96, § 1; 2015, ch. 97, § 1; 2015, ch. 98, § 1; 2015, ch. 99, § 1; 2015, ch. 100, § 1; 2015, ch. 101, § 1; 2015, ch. 102, § 1; 2015, ch. 103, § 1; 2015, ch. 104, § 1; 2015, ch. 105, § 1; 2015, ch. 106, § 1; 2015, ch. 107, § 1; 2015, ch. 108, § 1; 2015, ch. 109, § 1; 2015, ch. 128, § 1; 2015, ch. 129, § 1; 2015, ch. 144, § 1; 2015, ch. 145, § 1; 2015, ch. 146, § 1; 2015, ch. 147, § 1; 2015, ch. 148, § 1; 2015, ch. 149, § 1; 2015, ch. 150, § 1; 2015, ch. 151, § 1; 2015, ch. 163, § 1; 2015, ch. 174, § 1; 2015, ch. 190, § 1; 2015, ch. 191, § 1; 2015, ch. 204, § 1; 2015, ch. 205, § 1; 2015, ch. 206, § 1; 2015, ch. 229, § 1; 2015, ch. 259, § 1; 2015, ch. 385, § 1; 2015, ch. 418, § 1; 2017, ch. 326, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 444, § 1 deleted the Tennessee registry of election finance from §4-29-230(a), and Acts 2009, ch. 444, § 2 added the Tennessee registry of election finance to §4-29-236(a), effective June 23, 2009. Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 27 deleted the Tennessee registry of election finance from §4-29-230(a), effective June 30, 2009, without transferring the registry, removing the registry from governmental review.

The provisions relating to the review committee formerly found in § 12-4-109 were deleted by Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 13, effective April 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, ch. 289, § 103 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Workers' Compensation Reform Act of 2013.”

The former provisions concerning the institute for labor-management studies were deleted from subsection (a), since the institute was repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 3, effective July 1, 2013.

Act 2015, ch. 30, § 2 provided that, notwithstanding §4-29-112, the advisory committee on women’s health, created by §68-1-1804, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon March 27, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 33, § 5 provided that, notwithstanding §4-29-112, the hemophilia advisory committee, created by §68-41-103, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon March 27, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 34, § 2 provides that, notwithstanding §4-29-112, the medical care and cost containment committee, created by §50-6-125, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon March 27, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 72, § 4 provided that, notwithstanding §4-29-112, the Southern growth policies board, created by §13-2-101, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon April 6, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 87, § 5 provided that, notwithstanding §4-29-112, the higher education and technical institutions publication committee, created by §12-7-106, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon April 9, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 99, § 4 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112, the renal disease advisory committee, created by §68-35-102, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon April 10, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 190, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112, the advisory council on teacher education and certification, created by §49-5-110, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon April 22, 2015.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment by ch. 1 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the office of business enterprise, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2015, ch. 1, § 2, effective March 17, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 2 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the traumatic brain injury advisory council, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 2, § 2, effective March 19, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 3 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of claims, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 3, § 2, effective March 19, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 4 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the perinatal advisory committee, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 4, § 2, effective March 19, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 5 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the advisory council for the education of students with disabilities, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2015, ch. 5, § 2, effective March 19, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 6 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of alcohol and drug abuse counselors, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 6, § 2, effective March 19, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 7 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of osteopathic examination, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 7, § 2, effective March 19, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 8 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of trustees of the baccalaureate education system trust fund program, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 8, § 2, effective March 19, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 9 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of boiler rules, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 9, § 2, effective March 19, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 10 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the medical advisory committee, which was transferred to §4-29-239 by Acts 2015, ch. 10, § 2, effective March 19, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 11 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the medical payment committee, which was transferred to §4-29-239 by Acts 2015, ch. 11, § 2, effective March 19, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 12 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee claims commission, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 12, § 2, effective March 19, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 13 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the West Fork Drakes Creek dam and reservoir interstate authority, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2015, ch. 13, § 2, effective March 19, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 16 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of parole, which was transferred to §4-29-239 by Acts 2015, ch. 16, § 2, effective March 27, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 17 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of environment and conservation, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 17, § 2, effective March 27, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 18 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of health, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 18, § 2, effective March 27, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 30 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the advisory committee on women's health, which was terminated by Acts 2015, ch. 30, § 2, effective March 27, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 31 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the bureau of TennCare within the department of finance and administration, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 31, § 2, effective March 27, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 32 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of commerce and insurance, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 32, § 2, effective March 27, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 33 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the hemophilia advisory committee, which was terminated by Acts 2015, ch. 33, § 5, effective March 27, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 34 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the medical care and cost containment committee, which was terminated by Acts 2015, ch. 34, § 2, effective March 27, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 35 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee consolidated retirement system, board of trustees, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 35, § 2, effective March 27, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 36 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee council for the deaf, deaf-blind, and hard of hearing, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2015, ch. 36, § 2, effective March 27, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 37 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee peace officers standards and training commission, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 37, § 2, effective March 27, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 62 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the commission on firefighting personnel standards and education, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 62, § 2, effective April 6, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 63 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of correction, which was transferred to §4-29-239 by Acts 2015, ch. 63, § 2, effective April 6, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 64 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the prevailing wage commission, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 64, § 2, effective April 6, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 65 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee health information committee, which was transferred to §4-29-238 by Acts 2015, ch. 65, § 2, effective April 6, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 66 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the utility management review board, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2015, ch. 66, § 2, effective April 6, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 72 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the southern growth policies board, which was terminated by Acts 2015, ch. 72, § 4, effective April 6, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 86 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board for professional counselors, marital and family therapists, and clinical pastoral therapists, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 86, § 2, effective April 9, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 87 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the higher education and technical institutions publication committee, which was terminated by Acts 2015, ch. 87, § 4, effective April 9, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 96 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of dispensing opticians, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 96, § 2, effective April 10, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 97 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the James K. Polk memorial association, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 97, § 2, effective April 10, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 98 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the occupational safety and health review commission, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 98, § 2, effective April 10, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 99 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the renal disease advisory committee, which was terminated by Acts 2015, ch. 99, § 2, effective April 10, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 100 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state board of equalization, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 100, § 2, effective April 10, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 101 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Delta human resource agency, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 101, § 2, effective April 10, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 102 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the East Tennessee human resource agency, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 102, § 2, effective April 10, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 103 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the First Tennessee human resource agency, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 103, § 2, effective April 10, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 104 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Mid-Cumberland human resource agency, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 104, § 2, effective April 10, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 105 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the South Central Tennessee human resource agency, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 105, § 2, effective April 10, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 106 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Northwest Tennessee human resource agency, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 106, § 2, effective April 10, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 107 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Southeast Tennessee human resource agency, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 107, § 2, effective April 10, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 108 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Southwest Tennessee human resource agency, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 108, § 2, effective April 10, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 109 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Upper Cumberland human resource agency, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 109, § 2, effective April 10, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 128 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee state veterans’ homes board, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 128, § 2, effective April 9, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 129 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of education, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 129, § 2, effective April 9, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 144 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tri-county railroad authority, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2015, ch. 144, § 2, effective April 16, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 145 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the South Central Tennessee railroad authority, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2015, ch. 145, § 2, effective April 16, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 146 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the rail service authorities, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2015, ch. 146, § 2, effective April 16, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 147 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee soybean promotion board, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 147, § 2, effective April 16, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 148 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee dairy promotion committee, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 148, § 2, effective April 16, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 149 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the pork promotion board, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 149, § 2, effective April 16, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 150 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the egg promotion board, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 150, § 2, effective April 16, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 151 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the beef promotion board, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 151, § 2, effective April 16, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 163 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the consumer advocate division in the office of the attorney general and reporter, which was transferred to §4-29-238 by Acts 2015, ch. 163, § 2, effective April 16, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 174 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee aeronautics commission, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2015, ch. 174, § 2, effective April 16, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 190 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the advisory council on teacher education and certification, which was terminated by Acts 2015, ch. 190, § 3, effective April 22, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 191 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the elevator and amusement device safety board, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 191, § 2, effective April 22, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 204 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the air pollution control board, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 204, § 2, effective April 20, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 205 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of ground water management, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 205, § 2, effective April 20, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 206 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state board of education, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 206, § 2, effective April 20, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 229 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state unemployment compensation advisory council, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 229, § 2, effective April 21, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 259 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the commission on children and youth, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2015, ch. 259, § 2, effective April 24, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 385 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the information systems council, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 385, § 2, effective May 8, 2015.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 418 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of labor and workforce development, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2015, ch. 418, § 2, effective May 8, 2015.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 326 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee economic council on women, which was repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 326, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.